public/dictionaries/sv/sv.aff
# Swedish Hunspell Affix file for ONESEEK Δ+
#
# This is a reference file. Full SAOL affix rules are available from:
# https://extensions.libreoffice.org/en/extensions/show/swedish-spelling-dictionary-den-stora-svenska-ordlistan
#
# Installation:
# 1. Download Swedish dictionary from LibreOffice extensions
# 2. Extract sv_SE.dic and sv_SE.aff files
# 3. Rename to sv.dic and sv.aff
# 4. Place in this directory

SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzåäöxjqESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZÅÄÖXJQ

# Swedish specific characters
WORDCHARS åäöÅÄÖ-

# Sample affix rules (full version has thousands)
# Noun plural suffixes
SFX A Y 2
SFX A 0 r .
SFX A 0 rna .

# Verb conjugation
SFX B Y 4
SFX B a ar a
SFX B a ade a
SFX B a at a
SFX B a as a
