public/dictionaries/sv/sv.dic
# Swedish Hunspell Dictionary for ONESEEK Δ+
# 
# This is a reference file. Full SAOL dictionary is available from:
# https://extensions.libreoffice.org/en/extensions/show/swedish-spelling-dictionary-den-stora-svenska-ordlistan
#
# Installation:
# 1. Download Swedish dictionary from LibreOffice extensions
# 2. Extract sv_SE.dic and sv_SE.aff files
# 3. Rename to sv.dic and sv.aff
# 4. Place in this directory
#
# Common Swedish words (sample):
och
i
att
det
som
en
på
är
av
för
med
till
den
har
de
inte
om
ett
men
var
